Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-1303
Rules and regulations; shooting range
performance standards; review.

(1) The Game and Parks Commission shall adopt and promulgate
as rules and regulations the shooting range performance standards.

(2) The commission
shall review the shooting range performance standards at least once every
five years and revise them if necessary for the continuing safe operation
of shooting ranges.

Laws 2009, LB503, § 3.